Maryland, session 2026, HB0984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Recycling.
(J–1) (1) “MATTRESS” MEANS A RESILIENT MATERIAL OR COMBINATION OF
MATERIALS THAT IS ENCLOSED BY A TICKING, IS USED ALONE OR IN COMBINATION
WITH OTHER PRODUCTS, AND IS INTENDED FOR OR PROMOTED FOR SLEEPING ON.
(2) “MATTRESS” INCLUDES A FOUNDATION.
(3) “MATTRESS” DOES NOT INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 984
(I) AN UNATTACHED MATTRESS PAD OR TOPPER THAT IS
DESIGNED TO BE USED ON TOP OF OR IN ADDITION TO A MATTRESS;
(II) A WATERBED, AN AIR MATTRESS, OR ANY OTHER PRODUCT
THAT CONTAINS LIQUID– OR GAS–FILLED TICKING AND THAT DOES NOT CONTAIN
UPHOLSTERY MATERIAL BETWEEN THE TICKING AND THE MATTRESS CORE;
(III) A CARRIAGE, A BASKET, A DRESSING TABLE, A STROLLER, A
PLAYPEN, AN INFANT CARRIER, A LOUNGE PAD, A CRIB BUMPER, A CRIB MATTRESS,
A BASSINET MATTRESS, OR ANY OTHER PRODUCT MANUFACTURED FOR YOUNG
CHILDREN;
(IV) A SLEEPING BAG;
(V) A PILLOW;
(VI) A FUTON, SLEEPER SOFA, OR FOLD–OUT SOFA BED;
(VII) A CAR BED; OR
(VIII) FURNITURE THAT OTHERWISE DOES NOT CONTAIN A
DETACHABLE MATTRESS.
(J–2) “MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT” MEANS THE AMOUNT ADDED
TO THE PURCHASE PRICE OF MATTRESSES SOLD IN THE STATE THAT IS NECESSARY
TO COVER THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM’S COST, INCLUDING
COLLECTING, TRANSPORTING, MANAGING, AND PROCESSING POSTCONSUMER
MATTRESSES STATEWIDE, AND ADMINISTRATION, EDUCATION, AND OUTREACH.
(J–3) “MATTRESS WASTE MANAGEMENT ENTITY” MEANS A WASTE
MANAGEMENT COMPANY AUTHORIZED OR CONTRACTED BY THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM TO COLLECT, DISAGGREGATE, REDUCE, AND RECYCLE
MATTRESSES.
(m) “Office” means the Office of Recycling within the Department.
(O–2) (1) “POSTCONSUMER MATTRESS” MEANS A MATTRESS NO LONGER
WANTED BY A PURCHASER.
(2) “POSTCONSUMER MATTRESS” INCLUDES UNUSED MATTRESSES
AND MATTRESSES THAT HAVE BEEN USED AND ABANDONED OR DISCARDED IN THE
STATE.

HOUSE BILL 984 5
[(o–2)] (O–3) “Postconsumer paint” means architectural paint not used and no
longer wanted by a purchaser.
[(o–3)] (O–4) “Producer” means, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PART VI OF THIS
SUBTITLE, a manufacturer of architectural paint that sells, offers for sale, or distributes
the paint in the State under the producer’s own name or brand.
(R–2) (1) “RENOVATE” MEANS TO ALTER A DISCARDED MATTRESS FOR
RESALE THROUGH REPLACING THE TICKING OR FILLING, ADDING ADDITIONAL
FILLING, OR REPLACING COMPONENTS OF THE DISCARDED MATTRESS WITH NEW OR
RECYCLED MATERIALS.
(2) “RENOVATE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) STRIPPING A DISCARDED MATTRESS OF THE TICKING OR
FILLING WITHOUT ADDING NEW MATERIAL; OR
(II) THE SANITIZATION OR STERILIZATION OF A DISCARDED
MATTRESS WITHOUT OTHER ALTERATION TO THE DISCARDED MATTRESS.
[(r–2)] (R–3) “Representative organization” means, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
PART VI OF THIS SUBTITLE, a nonprofit organization created by producers to implement
a Paint Stewardship Program.
[(r–3)] (R–4) “Retailer” means, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PART VI OF THIS
SUBTITLE, any person that offers architectural paint for sale at retail in the State.
[(r–4)] (R–5) “Sale” or “sell” means any transfer of title for consideration,
including remote sales conducted through sales outlets, catalogues, the Internet, or any
other similar electronic means.
(R–6) “SANITIZATION” MEANS THE DIRECT APPLICATION OF CHEMICALS TO A
MATTRESS TO KILL PATHOGENS THAT CAUSE HUMAN DISEASE.
(S–1) “STERILIZATION” MEANS THE MITIGATION OF ANY DELETERIOUS
SUBSTANCES OR ORGANISMS, INCLUDING PATHOGENS THAT CAUSE HUMAN
DISEASE, FUNGI, AND INSECTS, FROM A MATTRESS OR FILLING MATERIAL USING A
CHEMICAL OR HEAT PROCESS.
9–1702.
(a) There is an Office of Recycling created within the Department.
(d) The Office shall:

HOUSE BILL 984
(1) Assist the counties in developing an acceptable recycling plan required
under § 9–1703 of this subtitle and § 9–505 of this title, including technical assistance to
the local governments;
(2) Coordinate the efforts of the State to facilitate the implementation of
the recycling goals at the county level;
(3) Review all recycling plans submitted as part of a county plan as
required under § 9–505 of this title and advise the Secretary on the adequacy of the
recycling plan;
(4) (I) REVIEW AND APPROVE PLANS AND ANNUAL REPORTS,
INCLUDING THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT, SUBMITTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER
PART VI OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) PROVIDE TO LOCAL COMMUNITIES THE MOST UP–TO–DATE
INFORMATION ON LOCAL AND NATIONAL PROGRAMS FOR THE RECYCLING OF
MATTRESSES; AND
(III) PROVIDE TO LOCAL COMMUNITIES FOR CONSIDERATION
EXAMPLES OF MATTRESS RECYCLING PROGRAMS THAT CREATE JOBS FOR:
1. UNEMPLOYED INDIVIDUALS;
2. HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS;
3. DISADVANTAGED YOUTH;
4. INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;
5. INDIVIDUALS WHO WERE INCARCERATED IN A LOCAL,
STATE, OR FEDERAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; AND
6. OTHER DISADVANTAGED INDIVIDUALS;
[(4)] (5) Administer the Statewide Electronics Recycling Program under
Part IV of this subtitle;
[(5)] (6) Promote the development of markets for recycled materials and
recycled products in the State in accordance with § 9–1702.1 of this subtitle;
[(6)] (7) Review and approve plans and annual reports, including the
paint stewardship assessment, submitted in accordance with a Paint Stewardship Program
established under Part V of this subtitle; and

HOUSE BILL 984 7
[(7)] (8) Review and approve, in consultation with the producer
responsibility advisory council established under § 9–2503 of this title, producer
responsibility plans and annual reports submitted in accordance with Subtitle 25 of this
title.
(e) On or before December 31, [2024] 2030, and every 2 years thereafter, the
Office shall, in coordination with the Maryland Environmental Service, study and report to
the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly on:
(1) The identification and location of recycling centers, including an
analysis of existing recycling centers and the need to expand these facilities or construct
new recycling centers;
(2) Programs necessary to educate the public on the need to participate in
recycling efforts;
(3) The economics and financing of existing and proposed systems of waste
disposal and recycling;
(4) State procurement policies for the purchase of recycled materials;
(5) Programs necessary to reduce the amount of solid waste generated for
disposal by a State agency or unit;
(6) The liaison role with local governments, the federal government, and
the private sector;
(7) The percentage reduction in the amount of solid waste that has been
achieved by each county; [and]
(8) Economically feasible methods for the recycling of scrap automobile
tires, batteries, and white goods; AND
(9) THE PROGRESS MADE IN THE STATE IN DIVERTING MATTRESSES
FROM DISPOSAL IN LANDFILLS AND INCINERATORS.
9–1707.
(f) (1) There is a State Recycling Trust Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) The newsprint recycling incentive fee;

HOUSE BILL 984
(ii) The telephone directory recycling incentive fee collected under §
9–1709 of this subtitle;
(iii) The covered electronic device manufacturer registration fee
collected under § 9–1728 of this subtitle;
(iv) The Paint Stewardship Program plan and annual report review
fees collected under § 9–1733(b) and (h) of this subtitle;
(v) THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM PLAN AND
ANNUAL REPORT REVIEW FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 9–1739(C)(2) AND (H)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(VI) Any fees collected from producer responsibility organizations
under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle or Subtitle 25 of this title;
[(vi)] (VII) All fines and penalties collected under this subtitle and §
9–2512 of this title;
[(vii)] (VIII) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
[(viii)] (IX) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(5) At the end of each fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in
the Fund that exceeds $2,000,000 shall revert to the General Fund of the State in
accordance with § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) In accordance with the State budget, the Fund shall be used only:
(i) To provide grants to the counties to be used by the counties to
develop and implement local recycling plans;
(ii) To provide grants to counties that have addressed methods for
the separate collection and recycling of covered electronic devices in accordance with §
9–1703(c)(1) of this subtitle;
(iii) To provide grants to municipalities to be used by the
municipalities to implement local covered electronic device recycling programs;

HOUSE BILL 984 9
(iv) To cover the costs of the Paint Stewardship Program plan review
under § 9–1733(b) of this subtitle, the annual report review under § 9–1733(h) of this
subtitle, and associated costs for Program compliance oversight; [and]
(V) TO COVER THE ACTUAL COSTS OF THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM PLAN REVIEW AND ANNUAL REPORT REVIEW UNDER §
9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR PROGRAM COMPLIANCE
OVERSIGHT;
[(v)] (VI) In accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to
cover the costs of a statewide recycling needs assessment conducted under § 9–1702.2 of
this subtitle;
[(vi)] (VII) In accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to
cover the costs of producer responsibility plan review, oversight, and enforcement under
Subtitle 25 of this title; and
[(vii)] (VIII) To carry out the purposes of the land management
administration.
(7) (i) There is a separate account within the Fund.
(ii) The separate account shall consist of:
1. Any fees collected from producer responsibility
organizations under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle or Subtitle 25 of this title; and
2. All fines and penalties collected under § 9–2512 of this
title.
(iii) The separate account shall be used only for the costs of statewide
recycling needs assessments conducted under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle and producer
responsibility plan review, oversight, and enforcement under Subtitle 25 of this title.
(8) (i) The Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
9–1715.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2035, A PERSON MAY NOT DISPOSE OF A MATTRESS IN A
LANDFILL.

HOUSE BILL 984
(2) A PERSON MAY DISPOSE OF A MATTRESS IN A LANDFILL IF THE
MATTRESS IS DEEPLY CONTAMINATED AND POSES A RISK TO PERSONNEL, NEW
PRODUCTS, OR EQUIPMENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2035, A PERSON MAY NOT DISPOSE OF A MATTRESS IN AN
INCINERATOR.
(2) A PERSON MAY DISPOSE OF A MATTRESS IN AN INCINERATOR IF
THE MATTRESS IS DEEPLY CONTAMINATED, THE MATTRESS CANNOT BE
RENOVATED, NO PARTS OF THE MATTRESS CAN BE RECYCLED, AND THE MATTRESS
POSES A RISK TO PERSONNEL, NEW PRODUCTS, OR EQUIPMENT, AS DETERMINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT.
9–1735. RESERVED.
9–1736. RESERVED.
PART VI. MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
9–1737.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADVISORY BOARD” MEANS THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ADVISORY
BOARD.
(C) “PREMIUM COLLECTION SERVICE” MEANS A MATTRESS COLLECTION
SERVICE THAT PROVIDES A GREATER SERVICE CONVENIENCE, FREQUENCY, OR
COMPONENT.
(D) (1) “PRODUCER” MEANS:
(I) A MANUFACTURER OF MATTRESSES THAT SELLS, OFFERS
FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES MATTRESSES IN THE STATE UNDER THE PRODUCER’S
OWN NAME OR BRAND; OR
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IMPORTS MATTRESSES INTO THE
STATE TO SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTE IN THE STATE.
(2) “PRODUCER” INCLUDES THE OWNER OF A MATTRESS
TRADEMARK OR BRAND, WHETHER OR NOT THE TRADEMARK OR BRAND IS
REGISTERED IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 984 11
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
(F) “REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION” MEANS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION CREATED BY PRODUCERS TO IMPLEMENT AND OPERATE A
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
(G) “RETAILER” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT OFFERS MATTRESSES FOR SALE
AT RETAIL IN THE STATE.
9–1738.
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT A PRODUCER OR
REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION THAT ORGANIZES THE COLLECTION, TRANSPORT,
AND PROCESSING OF MATTRESSES IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN APPROVED MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM LIABILITY FOR ANY CLAIM
UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW RELATING TO ANTITRUST AND RESTRAINT OF
TRADE, OR ANY UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE, ARISING FROM
CONDUCT UNDERTAKEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROGRAM.
9–1739.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2031, PRODUCERS OF MATTRESSES SOLD AT
RETAIL IN THE STATE, OR A REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION ACTING ON A
PRODUCER’S BEHALF, SHALL SUBMIT A PLAN FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL.
(B) (1) THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY THE MATERIALS, ENTITIES, AND RESPONSIBLE
PARTIES COVERED UNDER THE PLAN;
(II) DESCRIBE THE ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE OF ANY
REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION;
(III) DESCRIBE THE FINANCING METHOD FOR THE PLAN,
INCLUDING:
1. HOW FEES WILL BE STRUCTURED AND COLLECTED;
2. CONSIDERATION OF WHETHER TO SET A FEE,
CONSISTENT THROUGHOUT THE STATE, THAT IS:

HOUSE BILL 984
A. THE SAME FOR ALL MATTRESSES REGARDLESS OF
TYPE; OR
B. TIERED BASED ON MATTRESS TYPE; AND
3. AN ANALYSIS OF THE DIFFERENTIAL COST TO THE
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM OF THE FEE STRUCTURES IDENTIFIED IN ITEM
2 OF THIS ITEM;
(IV) DESCRIBE SOUND MANAGEMENT PRACTICES THAT WILL BE
USED FOR WORKER HEALTH AND SAFETY;
(V) DESCRIBE HOW DISCARDED MATTRESSES NOT COVERED
UNDER THE PROGRAM WILL BE HANDLED;
(VI) DESCRIBE HOW PRODUCERS WILL:
1. WORK WITH EXISTING RECYCLING PROGRAMS AND
INFRASTRUCTURE;
2. CONSULT WITH STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS; AND
3. CONDUCT RESEARCH AS NEEDED TO IMPROVE THE
COLLECTION AND RECYCLING OF MATTRESSES;
(VII) DESCRIBE HOW MATTRESS WASTE MANAGEMENT ENTITIES
WILL BE SOLICITED, RECRUITED, AND SUPPORTED, INCLUDING:
1. EXISTING MUNICIPAL, PRIVATE, AND NONPROFIT
ENTITIES IN THE STATE THAT WORK IN THE MATTRESS WASTE STREAM
MANAGEMENT FIELD;
2. EXISTING ENTITIES IN THE STATE THAT WORK IN THE
GENERAL WASTE MANAGEMENT FIELD;
3. ENTITIES THAT HAVE EXPERIENCE IN OR PRIORITIZE
DISAGGREGATION AND RECYCLING OF COMPONENT MATTRESS PARTS;
4. MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES;
5. MINORITY–OWNED BUSINESSES THAT ARE NOT
DESIGNATED AS MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES;

HOUSE BILL 984 13
6. WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES;
7. VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES; AND
8. BUSINESSES THAT PRIORITIZE THE TRAINING AND
HIRING OF:
A. INDIVIDUALS REENTERING SOCIETY AFTER
IMPRISONMENT;
B. INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS AND
HOUSING INSECURITY;
C. INDIVIDUALS IN ADDICTION RECOVERY;
D. INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES; AND
E. INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE OTHERWISE
SOCIOECONOMICALLY OR HISTORICALLY MARGINALIZED OR DISADVANTAGED;
(VIII) PROVIDE AN ESTIMATED ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGET;
(IX) PROVIDE A PLAN FOR MARKET DEVELOPMENT;
(X) PROVIDE THE TIME FRAME FOR ACHIEVING ZERO–WASTE
GOALS AND PROGRAM SUSTAINABILITY WITHOUT THE NEED FOR FEES BY:
1. ENCOURAGING EXPANSION AND DEVELOPMENT OF
DOWNSTREAM MARKETS FOR DISAGGREGATED COMPONENT MATTRESS PARTS;
2. INCREASING EFFICIENCIES OF END–OF–LIFE
PRODUCT MANAGEMENT; AND
3. ENCOURAGING EFFECTIVE COORDINATION AND
SHARING OF RESOURCES WHERE POSSIBLE; AND
(XI) PROVIDE A PLAN IN CASE OF CLOSURE OF THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE PLAN SHALL MINIMIZE PUBLIC SECTOR INVOLVEMENT IN,
AND FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY FOR, THE MANAGEMENT OF MATTRESS DISPOSAL
BY:
(I) PROMOTING MATTRESS RECYCLING;

HOUSE BILL 984
(II) NEGOTIATING AND EXECUTING AGREEMENTS TO COLLECT,
TRANSPORT, RECYCLE, PROCESS FOR MATERIALS RECOVERY, AND DISPOSE OF
MATTRESSES, AND AGREEMENTS TO REIMBURSE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH TASKS
UNDER EXISTING PUBLIC SECTOR PROGRAMS OR AGREEMENTS; AND
(III) PROVIDING FOR THE FINANCIAL REIMBURSEMENT TO
COLLECTION SITES FOR THE INCREASED COSTS OF COLLECTION.
(3) THE PLAN SHALL PROVIDE FOR CONVENIENT AND AVAILABLE
COLLECTION OF MATTRESSES STATEWIDE THAT:
(I) PROVIDES FOR FREE ACCESS TO COLLECTION OR
DROP–OFF OF MATTRESSES FROM IN–STATE RESIDENTIAL, COMMERCIAL, OR
INSTITUTIONAL CONSUMERS, OR OTHER IN–STATE SOURCES, ALONG WITH
CONVENIENCE EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN THE COLLECTION PROGRAMS
AVAILABLE TO CONSUMERS PRIOR TO THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM
STATEWIDE;
(II) PROVIDES A CONVENIENT METHOD FOR THE PUBLIC TO
ACCESS A LIST OF COLLECTION OR DROP–OFF OPTIONS;
(III) IDENTIFIES EACH PRODUCER PARTICIPATING IN THE
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM AND THE BRANDS OF MATTRESSES SOLD IN
THE STATE THAT ARE COVERED BY THE PROGRAM;
(IV) PROVIDES GEOGRAPHIC MODELING TO DETERMINE THE
NUMBER AND DISTRIBUTION OF SITES FOR ALL COLLECTION OF POSTCONSUMER
MATTRESSES BASED ON THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
1. UNLESS OTHERWISE APPROVED OR REQUIRED BY
THE DEPARTMENT, AT LEAST 90% OF THE RESIDENTS OF THE STATE SHALL HAVE A
COLLECTION SITE WITHIN A 15–MILE RADIUS; AND
2. UNLESS OTHERWISE APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, ONE ADDITIONAL COLLECTION SITE SHALL BE ESTABLISHED FOR
EVERY 50,000 RESIDENTS OF A GEOGRAPHICAL AREA;
(V) PROVIDES INFORMATION ON HOW MATTRESSES
CONTAMINATED BY BIOLOGICAL FLUIDS, TOXINS, OR INFECTIOUS AGENTS WILL BE
DISPOSED OF, INCLUDING WHETHER THE DISPOSAL WILL BE HANDLED IN OR OUT
OF THE STATE;
(VI) ALLOWS FOR SCHEDULING AND PICK–UP OF MATTRESSES
FROM PRIVATE PROPERTY; AND

HOUSE BILL 984 15
(VII) ALLOWS FOR A MATTRESS WASTE MANAGEMENT ENTITY TO:
1. OFFER A PREMIUM COLLECTION SERVICE UNDER THE
PROGRAM;
2. CHARGE FOR THE ADDITIONAL COST OF THAT
PREMIUM COLLECTION SERVICE; AND
3. CARRY OUT A STATEWIDE ASSESSMENT OF NEEDS
AND COSTS.
(4) THE PLAN MAY IDENTIFY A RETAILER AS A POSTCONSUMER
MATTRESS COLLECTION SITE IF:
(I) THE RETAILER VOLUNTEERS TO ACT AS A POSTCONSUMER
MATTRESS COLLECTION SITE;
(II) THE RETAILER IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE
LAWS AND REGULATIONS; AND
(III) THE SITE LOCATION OF THE RETAILER IS CONSISTENT WITH
MAINTAINING A COST–EFFECTIVE NETWORK OF POSTCONSUMER MATTRESS
COLLECTION LOCATIONS.
(5) (I) THE PLAN SHALL ESTABLISH:
1. A UNIFORM MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT
FOR ALL MATTRESSES SOLD IN THE STATE; AND
2. A MECHANISM FOR RETAILERS PARTICIPATING IN A
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM TO REMIT, AT THE POINT OF SALE, TO THE
REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION PAYMENT OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT FOR EACH MATTRESS SOLD IN THE STATE.
(II) THE UNIFORM MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE TIERED BASED
ON MATTRESS WEIGHT, CONSTRUCTION, SIZE, TYPE, RECYCLABILITY, RETAIL
PRICE, OR ANY OTHER FACTOR THE PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION DETERMINES WILL DISTRIBUTE THE ASSESSMENT MORE FAIRLY.
(6) THE PLAN SHALL ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE GOALS FOR:
(I) THE COLLECTION RATES OF DISCARDED MATTRESSES;

HOUSE BILL 984
(II) THE RECYCLING RATES OF DISCARDED MATTRESSES;
(III) IN COORDINATION WITH THE RENOVATORS AND TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE RENOVATION RATES OF DISCARDED MATTRESSES;
(IV) IN COORDINATION WITH LOCAL JURISDICTIONS AND TO
THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE NUMBER OF ILLEGALLY DUMPED MATTRESSES AND
THE SHARE OF DUMPED MATTRESSES AS A PERCENTAGE OF ALL MATTRESSES IN
THE PROGRAM; AND
(V) PUBLIC AWARENESS OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM.
(7) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT MAY NOT EXCEED
THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT MAY INCLUDE A FINANCIAL RESERVE SUFFICIENT TO OPERATE THE
PROGRAM OVER A MULTIYEAR PERIOD.
(8) (I) THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT SHALL BE
EVALUATED BY AN INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITOR, AS DESIGNATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, TO ENSURE THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM ARE COVERED BUT NOT EXCEEDED.
(II) THE COST OF ANY WORK PERFORMED BY AN INDEPENDENT
FINANCIAL AUDITOR SHALL BE FUNDED BY THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM.
(9) MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENTS MAY BE USED ONLY TO
IMPLEMENT THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
(10) (I) EACH PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION AND APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BE REEVALUATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT EVERY 5 YEARS.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE A PLAN TO BE REVISED
BEFORE ITS TIME PERIOD ENDS IF:
1. TARGETS ARE NOT BEING MET;

HOUSE BILL 984 17
2. THERE IS AN APPEAL TO THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP ADVISORY BOARD ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1742 OF THIS SUBTITLE
OR TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE BY AN ENTITY THAT RECEIVES REIMBURSEMENT UNDER
THE PLAN THAT WARRANTS A REVISION; OR
3. THERE IS A CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES THAT
WARRANTS A REVISION.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW:
(I) THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM PLAN REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE WORK PRODUCT OF THE INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL
AUDITOR DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO EVALUATE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENTS.
(2) THE PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION THAT
SUBMITS A PLAN FOR APPROVAL SHALL PAY A PLAN REVIEW FEE TO THE
DEPARTMENT TO BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND UNDER
§ 9–1707 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT COVERS THE DEPARTMENT’S COST OF PLAN
REVIEW, INCLUDING ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM
COMPLIANCE OVERSIGHT, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) (I) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM PLAN, INCLUDING THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT, COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE THE PROGRAM WITHIN 90 DAYS OF
SUBMISSION.
(II) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM PLAN, INCLUDING THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT, REQUIRES MODIFICATION, THE PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION SHALL HAVE 30 DAYS TO MODIFY THE PLAN.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL LIST ON ITS WEBSITE THE PRODUCERS,
BRANDS, RENOVATORS, AND RETAILERS IMPLEMENTING OR PARTICIPATING IN AN
APPROVED MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
(D) (1) A PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION SHALL
IMPLEMENT ITS MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM PLAN WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER
THE PLAN’S APPROVAL BY THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 984
(2) BEGINNING 1 YEAR AFTER A PRODUCER’S OR REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION’S PLAN IS APPROVED:
(I) A PRODUCER OR RETAILER MAY NOT SELL OR OFFER FOR
SALE A BRAND OF MATTRESS TO ANY PERSON IN THE STATE, UNLESS THE
PRODUCER OF THE BRAND OR A REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION OF WHICH THE
PRODUCER IS A MEMBER IS IMPLEMENTING AN APPROVED MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM;
(II) A PRODUCER SHALL ADD THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER AN APPROVED MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM TO THE COST OF ALL MATTRESSES SOLD TO RETAILERS AND
DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE; AND
(III) EACH RETAILER OR DISTRIBUTOR SHALL ADD THE
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER AN APPROVED
MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM TO THE PURCHASE PRICE OF ALL MATTRESSES
SOLD IN THE STATE BY DISPLAYING A LINE ITEM ON THE RECEIPT FOR THE ADDED
COST.
(E) (1) A PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION
PARTICIPATING IN AN APPROVED MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM SHALL
PROVIDE CONSUMERS WITH EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS REGARDING THE PROGRAM
THAT INCLUDE:
(I) INFORMATION REGARDING AVAILABLE END–OF–LIFE
MANAGEMENT OPTIONS FOR MATTRESSES OFFERED THROUGH THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) INFORMATION THAT NOTIFIES CONSUMERS THAT AN
ASSESSMENT TO COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM IS INCLUDED
IN THE PURCHASE PRICE OF ALL MATTRESSES SOLD IN THE STATE.
(2) FOLLOWING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM, A RETAILER SHALL PROVIDE CONSUMERS, AT THE POINT
OF RETAIL SALE, WITH EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS, PROVIDED BY A PRODUCER OR
REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION, ON AVAILABLE COLLECTION OPPORTUNITIES
FOR POSTCONSUMER MATTRESSES THROUGH THE PROGRAM.
(F) FOLLOWING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM, A RETAILER COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION IF,
ON THE DATE THE MATTRESS WAS ORDERED FROM THE PRODUCER OR ITS AGENT,
THE PRODUCER OF THE MATTRESS BRAND IS LISTED ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE AS IMPLEMENTING OR PARTICIPATING IN AN APPROVED MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 984 19
(G) A POSTCONSUMER MATTRESS COLLECTION SITE THAT IS IDENTIFIED IN
THE PLAN MAY NOT CHARGE AN ADDITIONAL FEE FOR THE DISPOSAL OF
MATTRESSES WHEN MATTRESSES ARE OFFERED FOR DISPOSAL OR RECYCLING
UNDER AN APPROVED MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
(H) (1) BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2033, OR 1 YEAR AFTER PLAN APPROVAL,
WHICHEVER IS LATER, AND ANNUALLY THEREAFTER, THE PRODUCER OR
REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AND
PUBLISH ONLINE A REPORT THAT DETAILS THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE METHODS USED TO COLLECT,
TRANSPORT, AND PROCESS MATTRESSES IN THE STATE;
(II) THE AMOUNT BY VOLUME OR WEIGHT, AS SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, AND TYPE OF MATTRESSES COLLECTED IN THE STATE SORTED BY
TYPE OF COLLECTION SITE AND THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION IN WHICH THE
MATTRESSES WERE COLLECTED;
(III) THE AMOUNT BY VOLUME OR WEIGHT, AS SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, AND TYPE OF MATTRESSES COLLECTED IN THE STATE BY METHODS
OF DISPOSITION, INCLUDING RECYCLING AND OTHER METHODS OF PROCESSING OR
DISPOSAL, USING METRICS FOR EVALUATION AND PROGRESS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, FOR EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE;
(IV) THE TOTAL COST OF IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING
THE PROGRAM, AS DETERMINED BY AN INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDIT FUNDED
BY THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT;
(V) SAMPLES OF EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS USED TO INFORM
CONSUMERS OF MATTRESS RECYCLING OR DISPOSAL, A SUMMARY OF PUBLIC
EDUCATION EFFORTS, AND AN EVALUATION OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THESE
METHODS;
(VI) AN EVALUATION OF WHY MATTRESSES THAT WERE NOT
RECYCLED WERE NOT RECYCLED;
(VII) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF MATTRESSES SOLD TO CONSUMERS
IN THE PREVIOUS YEAR;
(VIII) STRATEGIES TO ADDRESS POSTCONSUMER AND DISCARDED
MATTRESSES THAT ARE NOT INCLUDED IN THE PROGRAM AND THAT ARE ILLEGALLY
DUMPED;

HOUSE BILL 984
(IX) REPORTS ON RESEARCH ACTIVITIES, PILOT PROGRAMS,
AND ANY CHANGES IN MATTRESS DESIGN;
(X) THE NUMBER OF POSTCONSUMER MATTRESSES RECEIVED
THROUGH COLLECTION THAT WERE NOT INCLUDED IN THE PROGRAM;
(XI) IN COORDINATION WITH LOCAL JURISDICTIONS AND TO
THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE NUMBER OF POSTCONSUMER MATTRESSES THAT
WERE ILLEGALLY DUMPED AS REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT;
(XII) AN ANALYSIS OF HOW THE DATA REQUIRED BY THIS
PARAGRAPH HAS CHANGED OVER TIME;
(XIII) AN EVALUATION OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF METHODS AND
PROCESSES USED TO ACHIEVE THE GOALS OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING
INFORMATION ON PROGRESS MADE TOWARD ACHIEVING THE GOALS, AN
EXPLANATION OF WHY ANY GOALS WERE NOT MET DURING THE PREVIOUS
CALENDAR YEAR, AND ANY EFFORTS THAT WILL BE TAKEN TO IMPROVE PROGRESS
TOWARD MEETING THE GOALS IN THE FUTURE, IF APPLICABLE;
(XIV) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ANY CHANGES TO THE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING INFORMATION RELEVANT TO COMPLIANCE WITH THE PLAN; AND
(XV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION THAT
SUBMITS A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PAY A REPORT
REVIEW FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT TO BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE RECYCLING
TRUST FUND UNDER § 9–1707 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT COVERS THE DEPARTMENT’S
COST OF REPORT REVIEW, INCLUDING ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR PROGRAM
COMPLIANCE OVERSIGHT, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE ANNUAL REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION AND:
(I) EVALUATE THE TOTAL COSTS OF THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM, INCLUDING ALL EXPENSES AND REVENUES, TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT MEETS OR
EXCEEDS THE COSTS OF THE PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(8)
OF THIS SECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 984 21
(II) DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROGRAM IS BEING
IMPLEMENTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PLAN APPROVED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP ANNUAL REPORT, INCLUDING THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT, COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE THE ANNUAL REPORT.
(3) THE PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION SHALL
MAKE THE APPROVED ANNUAL REPORT AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(4) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP ANNUAL REPORT, INCLUDING THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
ASSESSMENT, DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE
PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
DEPARTMENT A PLAN ON HOW THE PRODUCER OR REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION WILL ADDRESS THE NONCOMPLIANCE IN THE UPCOMING YEAR.
(J) (1) FINANCIAL, PRODUCTION, OR SALES DATA REPORTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT BY A PRODUCER OR THE REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION SHALL BE
KEPT CONFIDENTIAL BY THE DEPARTMENT AND MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO PUBLIC
INSPECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY RELEASE SUMMARY DATA THAT DOES
NOT DISCLOSE FINANCIAL, PRODUCTION, OR SALES DATA OF A PRODUCER,
RETAILER, OR REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION.
9–1740.
(A) A RETAILER THAT VIOLATES THIS PART IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT TO EXCEED $100 PER DAY FOR EACH DAY OF THE VIOLATION.
(B) A PRODUCER OR RENOVATOR THAT VIOLATES THIS PART IS SUBJECT TO
A CIVIL PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED $1,000 PER DAY FOR EACH DAY OF THE
VIOLATION.
(C) ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PLACED IN
A SPECIAL FUND TO BE USED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ENSURE THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF APPROVED MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAMS.
9–1741.

HOUSE BILL 984
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY COOPERATE WITH DEPARTMENTS, AGENCIES,
AND OTHER EQUIVALENT BODIES IN OTHER STATES IN ORDER TO FURTHER THE
OBJECTIVES OF THIS PART.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT MEASURES TO MOVE THE STATE
TOWARD A MORE EQUITABLE RECYCLING AND WASTE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM AND TO
SEEK ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE FOR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES.
(2) MEASURES ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) CONDUCTING STUDIES ON HOW TO IMPROVE ACCESS TO
RECYCLING FOR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
(II) CONDUCTING STUDIES ON HOW TO IMPROVE SOCIAL
EQUITY WITHIN THE RECYCLING SYSTEM, INCLUDING ENSURING EQUITABLE
EMPLOYMENT AND DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES;
(III) PROVIDING A PLATFORM FOR RECOMMENDATIONS FROM
ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AND COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS ON HOW TO
IMPROVE THE PROGRAM;
(IV) REQUIRING REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATIONS TO
GUARANTEE PRODUCTS ARE TRANSFERRED TO RESPONSIBLE END MARKETS THAT
MEET ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC SAFETY STANDARDS;
(V) REQUIRING ALL CONTRACTS MADE BY A REPRESENTATIVE
ORGANIZATION TO INCLUDE LANGUAGE GUARANTEEING A LIVABLE WAGE AND
QUALITY BENEFITS TO WORKERS; AND
(VI) REQUIRING REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATIONS TO
TRANSLATE ALL EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS INTO THE LANGUAGES SPOKEN BY
LOCAL POPULATIONS AND TO ENSURE THAT COLLECTION INFRASTRUCTURE IS
ACCESSIBLE TO DISABLED RESIDENTS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ENFORCE THIS
PART THAT INCLUDE A CLARIFICATION OF THE AUTHORITY AND RESPONSIBILITY TO
INSPECT AND ENFORCE THE PROGRAM BETWEEN LOCAL AND STATE
GOVERNMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Environment

HOUSE BILL 984 23
9–1742.
(A) THERE IS A MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ADVISORY BOARD.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE ADVISORY BOARD IS TO ADVISE ON THE PROPER
IMPLEMENTATION AND SUSTAINABILITY OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM.
(C) THE ADVISORY BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE COMPTROLLER, OR THE COMPTROLLER’S DESIGNEE; AND
(7) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MATTRESS RETAILERS;
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MATTRESS
MANUFACTURING INDUSTRY;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MATTRESS RECYCLERS;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND CHAPTER OF
THE SIERRA CLUB;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ENVIRONMENTAL ADVOCACY
GROUP;
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ADVOCACY GROUP FOR THE
REHABILITATION OF FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS;
(VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF INDEPENDENT HAULERS OF
BULK WASTE;

HOUSE BILL 984
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION
OF COUNTIES;
(IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL
LEAGUE; AND
(X) ONE CONSUMER REPRESENTATIVE EACH FROM WESTERN
MARYLAND, CENTRAL MARYLAND, SOUTHERN MARYLAND, AND THE EASTERN
SHORE.
(D) IN APPOINTING INDIVIDUALS TO THE ADVISORY BOARD, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL CONSIDER APPOINTING INDIVIDUALS FROM UNDERSERVED,
OVERBURDENED, LOW–INCOME, AND HISTORICALLY MARGINALIZED COMMUNITIES.
(E) (1) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL:
(I) REVIEW AND EVALUATE THE STRUCTURE, FINANCING, AND
OTHER ASPECTS OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM;
(II) REVIEW AND EVALUATE EACH MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PLAN REQUIRED UNDER § 9–1739(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE BEFORE THE PLAN IS
SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL;
(III) CONSULT WITH AND ADVISE PRODUCERS AND
REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATIONS AS THEY PREPARE THE MATTRESS
STEWARDSHIP PLAN;
(IV) 1. RECEIVE AND REVIEW THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP
PLANS SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT
REGARDING MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPROVAL;
(V) 1. RECEIVE AND REVIEW ANNUAL REPORTS SUBMITTED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT
REGARDING THE NEED FOR ANY PLAN AMENDMENTS OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS
BASED ON THE ADVISORY BOARD’S REVIEW OF THE REPORTS; AND
(VI) REVIEW AND COMMENT ON DRAFT REGULATIONS
RELEVANT TO THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 984 25
(2) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY UNTIL
THE INITIAL ROUND OF STEWARDSHIP PLANS HAVE BEEN APPROVED, AND
SEMIANNUALLY OR ANNUALLY, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT,
THEREAFTER.
(3) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG THE
MEMBERS BY A SIMPLE MAJORITY VOTE.
(4) THE ADVISORY BOARD MAY ADOPT BYLAWS AND A CHARTER FOR
THE OPERATION OF THE ADVISORY BOARD’S BUSINESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
PART.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
BOARD.
(6) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2031, THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL
REPORT, AND IF APPLICABLE SUBMIT A MINORITY REPORT ON, ITS FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or after July 1, 2030, a contract or agreement for the recycling of
mattresses in existence prior to the effective date of this Act may not be renewed unless the
contract or agreement conforms to or is modified to conform to the requirements of a
Mattress Stewardship Program plan as enacted by this Act.
(b) On or before December 1, 2030, the Department of the Environment shall, if
necessary, request legislation to further implement this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before December 31,
2033, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee shall jointly review the Mattress Stewardship
Program to evaluate the Program’s implementation, effectiveness, and impact.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2029.